Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 147.74, subsection 17, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17. A person who qualifies for licensure as a physician assistant licensed associate under chapter 148C may use the words âphysician assistant associate â after the personâs name or signify the same by the use of the letters âP. A.â after the personâs name. Sec. 2. PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT TITLE CHANGE. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all references in the Iowa Code and Iowa Administrative Code to âphysician assistantâ shall be revised to âphysician associateâ. The terms âphysician assistantâ, âphysician associateâ, and âP.A.â are synonymous, and all rights and responsibilities of a physician assistant under current law are unaffected by the change in title to âphysician associateâ. 2. All persons or entities employing, coordinating treatment with, following orders from, training, educating, or contracting with a person licensed as a physician assistant or educating individuals in an accredited physician assistant or physician associate education program, including but not limited to a hospital or other health care facility, physician, third-party payor, the federal government, and malpractice Senate File 2190, p. 2 insurance carriers, shall continue the relationship without interruption or alteration as a result of the change in title to âphysician associateâ. A person or entity shall not discriminate against an individual in contracting with the individual, employment, or otherwise solely as a result of the individualâs use of the title âphysician associateâ. 3. During the time before the title âphysician associateâ enters common usage, a person eligible for licensure under chapter 148C may use the title âphysician assistantâ, âphysician associateâ, or âP.A.â. A person or entity interacting with a person using the title âphysician associateâ is entitled to rely on the person having all rights and responsibilities of a physician assistant. 4. The change in title from âphysician assistantâ to âphysician associateâ does not expand or alter the scope of practice of a person licensed under chapter 148C. 5. Not later than January 1, 2027, each agency shall, as soon as practicable and in the most cost-efficient manner possible, make amendments to active versions of sub-regulatory guidance, documents, and forms to reflect the change in title from âphysician assistantâ to âphysician associateâ. Sec. 3. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE ââ TERMINOLOGY CHANGES. 1. The Code editor is directed to change all references to âphysician assistantâ and its derivatives to âphysician associateâ and its derivatives, as appropriate, wherever they appear in the Code, including in sections 90A.1, 90A.8, 96.5, 124E.2, 135.1, 135.17, 135.24, 135.39D, 135.105D, 135.146, 135.190A, 135.194, 135B.1, 135B.7, 135G.1, 135G.3, 135H.3, 135J.1, 135P.1, 136A.2, 136C.3, 137.105, 139A.2, 139A.8, 139A.22, 139A.35, 139A.41, 141A.1, 141A.5, 141A.6, 141A.7, 142C.8, 144.26, 144.28, 144A.2, 144A.4, 144A.7A, 144B.1, 144B.5, 144B.6, 144D.1, 144D.2, 144D.3, 144D.4, 144F.2, 147.1, 147.2, 147.13, 147.14, 147.77, 147.107, 147.136, 147.136A, 147.138, 147A.1, 147A.8, 147A.9, 147A.10, 147A.13, 148C.1, 148C.2, 148C.3, 148C.4, 148C.5, 148C.8, 148C.9, 148C.11, 148C.13, 148F.7, 148G.1, 148H.4, 152.1, 152B.1, 152C.9, 152D.4, 152D.7, 154C.7, 154D.4, 154F.2, 155A.3, 155A.23, 189A.6, 225.9, 225.12, 225.15, 225.16, 228.1, 229.22, 232.68, 232.71B, 232.78, 232.79, 232.95, 233.1, 234.22, 235A.13, 237A.5, 237A.13, 249.3, Senate File 2190, p. 3 249A.4, 249A.4B, 249N.2, 252E.1, 256.222, 272C.1, 272C.2C, 280.13C, 280.16, 280A.1, 321.34, 321.186, 321.375, 321.446, 321J.7, 321J.11, 321L.2, 321L.2A, 411.5, 462A.14A, 489.1101, 489.1102, 489.1105, 496C.2, 496C.4, 496C.7, 514C.11, 514C.17, 514C.18, 514C.20, 514C.25, 514C.28, 514F.6, 614.1, 622.10, 668A.1, 669.2, 702.8, 707A.1, 730.5, and 915.46. 2. The Code editor is directed to make changes in any Code sections or other noncodified enactments amended or enacted by any other Act to correspond with the changes made in this Act if there appears to be no doubt as to the proper method of making the changes and the changes would not be contrary to or inconsistent with the purposes of this Act or any other Act. Sec. 4. AMENDMENTS TO ADMINISTRATIVE RULES. Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 17A to the contrary, an agency may submit amendments to administrative rules in accordance with this Act to the administrative code editor to be updated editorially. Such amendments shall be limited to updating the term âphysician assistantâ and its derivatives to âphysician associateâ and corresponding derivatives. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2190, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor